Massachusetts, session 194th, H3195.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of chapter 64H of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2010 Official edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(yy) Any retail sale, as defined by this chapter, made within 10 miles of the New
Hampshire border.
of 1